Washington statutes.
RCW 36.64.050

Joint armory sites.

Any city or county in the state may expend money from its current expense funds in payment in whole or in part for an armory site whenever the legislature has authorized the construction of an armory within such city or county.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.64.050. Prior: 1913 c 91 s 1; RRS s 3996.]